Nebraska, session 109, LB434.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 28-1239.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-1239.01 (1) No person shall conduct a public exhibition or display of
display fireworks without first procuring a display permit from the State Fire
Marshal. Such application for a display permit shall be accompanied by a fee of
one hundred ten dollars to be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to
deposited in the State Fire Marshal Cash Fund.
(2) No display fireworks shall be sold or delivered by a licensed
distributor to any person who is not in possession of an approved display
permit. Sales of display fireworks to persons without an approved display
permit shall be subject to sections 28-1213 to 28-1239.
Sec. 2. Section 28-1246, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
28-1246 (1) It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, hold for sale, or
offer for sale as a distributor, jobber, or retailer any fireworks in this
state unless such person has first obtained a license as a distributor, jobber,
or retailer. Application for each such license shall be made to the State Fire
Marshal on forms prescribed by him or her. Each application shall be
accompanied by the required fee, which shall be one thousand five hundred
dollars for a distributor's license, four two hundred dollars for a jobber's
license, and one hundred twenty-five dollars for a retailer's license. Each
application for a retailer's license shall be received by the State Fire
Marshal at least ten business days prior to the sales period, as set forth in
section 28-1249, in which the retailer wishes to sell consumer fireworks. A
retailer's license shall be good only for the specific sales period listed on
the application and within the calendar year in which issued. The retailer's
license shall at all times be displayed at the place of business of the holder
thereof.
(2) The funds received pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the
State Treasurer for credit to the State Fire Marshal Cash Fund.
Sec. 3. Section 28-1251, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
28-1251 (1) It shall be unlawful for any person, association, partnership,
limited liability company, or corporation to conduct fire alarm tests and fire
alarm inspections without prior written certification by the State Fire Marshal
as to the qualifications of such persons conducting such tests and inspections.
(2) The State Fire Marshal shall formulate reasonable guidelines to
determine qualifications for fire alarm inspectors and shall administer an
examination pursuant to such guidelines prior to certification of applicants.
(3) The State Fire Marshal may charge a fee of no more than two one
hundred dollars to cover costs of administering such examinations and issuing
certifications.
(4) Unlawful testing or inspection of fire alarms is a Class III
misdemeanor.
Sec. 4. Section 81-503.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-503.01 (1) The State Fire Marshal shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations constituting a State Fire Code. At a minimum, the State Fire Code
shall cover:
(a) The prevention of fires;
(b) The storage, sale, and use of flammable liquids, combustibles, and
fireworks;
(c) Electrical wiring and heating, protection equipment devices,
materials, furnishings, and other safeguards within structures necessary to
promote safety and reduce loss by fire;
(d) The means and adequacy of exits, in case of fire, in assembly,
educational, institutional, residential, mercantile, office, storage, and
industrial-type occupancies as such structures are defined in the State Fire
Code;
(e) All other buildings, structures, and enclosures in which numbers of
persons congregate from time to time for any purpose, whether privately or
publicly owned;
(f) Design, construction, location, installation, and operation of
equipment for storing, handling, and utilization of liquefied petroleum gases,
specifying the odorization of such gases and the degree thereof;
(g) Chemicals, prozylin plastics, X-ray nitrocellulose films, or any other
-1-

LB434 LB434
2025 2025
hazardous material that may now or hereafter exist;
(h) Tanks used for the storage of regulated substances pursuant to the
Petroleum Products and Hazardous Substances Storage and Handling Act; and
(i) Accessibility standards and specifications adopted pursuant to section
81-5,147.
(2) Not later than July 1, 2019, the rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated as part of the State Fire Code shall conform generally to the
standards recommended by the National Fire Protection Association, Pamphlet
Number 1, known as the Fire Code, 2012 edition, the National Fire Protection
Association, Pamphlet Number 101, known as the Life Safety Code, 2012 edition,
and associated pamphlets, but not when doing so would impose an unduly severe
or costly burden without substantially contributing to the safety of persons or
property.
(3) The State Fire Marshal shall enforce the State Fire Code through
inspections, code compliance, and orders. Plans for compliance with the State
Fire Code shall be reviewed by the State Fire Marshal. Plans submitted after
remodeling or construction has begun shall be accompanied by a late submittal
fee penalty of an amount equal to one hundred dollars plus fifty percent of the
fifty dollars in addition to the plan review fee established pursuant to
subdivision (4)(a) of section 81-505.01 in addition to such plan review fee.
(4) Rules and regulations adopted and promulgated as part of the State
Fire Code shall apply to sites or structures in public ownership listed on the
National Register of Historic Places but without destroying the historic
quality thereof.
Sec. 5. Section 81-505.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-505.01 (1) The State Fire Marshal shall establish and assess fees not
to exceed the actual costs for the performance of services by the State Fire
Marshal or by qualified local fire prevention personnel to whom the State Fire
Marshal has delegated authority to perform such services. Prior to establishing
or altering such fees, the State Fire Marshal shall hold a public hearing on
the question of the adoption of or change in fees. Notice of such hearing shall
be given at least thirty days prior thereto (a) by publication in a newspaper
having general circulation in the state and (b) by notifying in writing the
head of any agency or department having jurisdiction over facilities that would
be subject to the fees. Fees for services performed by the State Fire Marshal
shall be paid to the State Fire Marshal and shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer for credit to the State Fire Marshal Cash Fund. Fees for services
performed by local fire prevention personnel shall be paid directly to the
office of the local fire prevention personnel.
(2) The fee for inspection for fire safety of any premises or facility
pursuant to section 81-502 or 81-503.01 shall be not less than fifty twenty-
five nor more than three hundred one hundred fifty dollars and shall be paid by
the licensee or applicant for a license. The fee for inspection for fire safety
of the same premises or facility made within twelve months after the last prior
inspection shall be not less than fifty twenty-five nor more than three one
hundred fifty dollars and shall be paid by the licensee or applicant for a
license. The fees for inspection for fire safety of foster family homes as
defined in section 71-1901 may be paid by the Department of Health and Human
Services.
(3) The fee for providing investigation reports to insurance companies
shall not exceed three dollars for each report provided. The State Fire Marshal
may charge an amount not to exceed the actual cost of preparation for any other
approved information release.
(4)(a) The State Fire Marshal shall charge a fee for reviewing plans,
blueprints, and shop drawings to determine compliance with rules and
regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to section 81-503.01 or 81-5,147.
The State Fire Marshal shall establish such fee in rules and regulations
adopted and promulgated to be effective on September 1, 2025 January 1, 2022.
Such fee shall meet the costs of administering the plan review requirement
found in sections 81-503.01 and 81-5,147 but shall not exceed five thousand
five hundred dollars. The fee schedule as it existed prior to September 1, 2025
August 28, 2021, shall be used through August 31, 2025 December 31, 2021.
(b) The fees established pursuant to subdivision (a) of this subsection
shall not be assessed or collected by any political subdivision to which the
State Fire Marshal has delegated the authority to conduct such review and which
reviews plans, blueprints, or shop drawings to determine compliance with such
political subdivision's own fire safety regulations. Nothing in this
subdivision shall be construed to prohibit such political subdivision from
assessing or collecting a fee set by its governing board for such review.
(c) An additional fee equal to fifty percent of the fee charged pursuant
to subdivision (a) of this subsection shall be assessed for reviewing plans,
blueprints, and shop drawings to determine compliance with the accessibility
standards and specifications adopted pursuant to section 81-5,147, except that
the additional fee assessed pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed five
thousand two hundred fifty dollars.
Sec. 6. Section 81-5,159, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-5,159 (1) Any water-based fire protection system contractor who
installs, repairs, alters, adds to, maintains, or inspects water-based fire
protection systems in this state shall first obtain a contractor certificate.
(2) A water-based fire protection system contractor may apply to the State
Fire Marshal for a contractor certificate. The application shall be made on a
-2-

LB434 LB434
2025 2025
form prescribed by the State Fire Marshal and shall include a certificate fee
of up to two one hundred dollars. Each applicant must designate a responsible
managing employee on the application, and such individual's name shall appear
on the certificate with that of the water-based fire protection system
contractor upon issuance. Proof of insurance required by section 81-5,160 shall
also accompany the application.
(3) Upon receipt of a complete application, proof of insurance, and
certificate fee, the State Fire Marshal shall schedule a time for an
examination of the responsible managing employee to demonstrate that he or she
is familiar with the procedures and rules of the State Fire Marshal relating to
water-based fire protection systems. If the responsible managing employee
passes the examination, the State Fire Marshal shall issue the certificate to
the water-based fire protection system contractor within thirty days.
(4) A certificate shall expire on September 30 of the year following
issuance. An application for renewal shall be filed at least ten days prior to
expiration and shall be accompanied by a renewal fee of up to two one hundred
dollars and a sworn affidavit that the responsible managing employee is
currently employed by the water-based fire protection system contractor. A
water-based fire protection system contractor who fails to apply for renewal
within the time stated in this subsection must make a new application for a
certificate.
(5) A responsible managing employee may only act as such for one water-
based fire protection system contractor at a time. When a responsible managing
employee terminates his or her association with a water-based fire protection
system contractor, the water-based fire protection system contractor shall
notify the State Fire Marshal within thirty days after termination. The
responsible managing employee shall not be designated as the responsible
managing employee for more than two water-based fire protection system
contractors in any twelve-month period. The State Fire Marshal shall revoke the
certificate of a water-based fire protection system contractor whose
responsible managing employee has terminated his or her association with the
water-based fire protection system contractor unless an application designating
a new responsible managing employee is filed within six months after
termination or prior to expiration of the current certificate, whichever is
earlier.
Sec. 7. Section 81-15,120, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,120 Any farm or residential tank or tank used for storing heating
oil as defined in subdivisions (10)(a) and (b) of section 81-15,119 shall be
registered with the State Fire Marshal. The registration shall be accompanied
by a one-time fee of ten five dollars and shall be valid until the State Fire
Marshal is notified that a tank so registered has been permanently closed. Such
registration shall specify the ownership of, location of, and substance stored
in the tank to be registered. The State Fire Marshal shall remit the fee to the
State Treasurer for credit to the Petroleum Products and Hazardous Substances
Storage and Handling Fund which is hereby created as a cash fund. The fund
shall also consist of any money appropriated to the fund by the state. The fund
shall be administered by the Department of Environment and Energy to carry out
the purposes of the Petroleum Products and Hazardous Substances Storage and
Handling Act, including the provision of matching funds required by Public Law
99-499 for actions otherwise authorized by the act. Any money in such fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 8. Section 81-15,121, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,121 (1) A person shall not (a) maintain or use any tank for the
storage of regulated substances, (b) install any new tank, or (c) permanently
close a tank without first securing a permit from the State Fire Marshal.
(2) A fee shall not be charged for a permit under subdivision (1)(a) or
(c) of this section. The fee for a permit for installation shall be seventy-
five fifty dollars. The State Fire Marshal shall remit the fee to the State
Treasurer for credit to the Underground Storage Tank Fund.
(3) All owners of operating tanks, except those provided for in subsection
(4) of this section, shall annually register each tank. All registration
permits shall expire on December 31 of the year for which the permit was
issued. The registration fee shall be no more than sixty thirty dollars per
tank. The State Fire Marshal shall remit the fee to the State Treasurer for
credit to the Underground Storage Tank Fund. Such permits shall contain the
information specified in subsection (5) of this section.
(4) In the case of tanks permanently abandoned on or after January 1,
1974, an annual permit shall not be required and an initial registration permit
shall be sufficient.
(5) The application for a registration permit shall be provided by and
filed with the State Fire Marshal's office and shall require, but not be
limited to, the following information:
(a) The date the tank was placed in or taken out of operation;
(b) The age of the tank;
(c) The size, type, and location of the tank; and
(d) The type of substances stored in the tank and the quantity of such
substances remaining in the tank if the tank has been permanently closed.
(6) The registration permit fee collected pursuant to this section shall
be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to deposited in the Underground
-3-

LB434 LB434
2025 2025
Storage Tank Fund which is hereby created as a cash fund. The fund shall also
consist of any money appropriated to the fund by the state. The fund shall be
administered by the State Fire Marshal to carry out the purposes of the
Petroleum Products and Hazardous Substances Storage and Handling Act. Transfers
may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the
Legislature. Any money in the Underground Storage Tank Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 9. Original sections 28-1239.01, 28-1246, 28-1251, 81-503.01,
81-505.01, 81-5,159, 81-15,120, and 81-15,121, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 10. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-4-